California, session 20252026, SB1096.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17054.8 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17054.8. (a) (1) For each taxable year years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, a senior tax credit to a qualified taxpayer in an amount equal to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per qualified dependent claimed. claimed, subject to the reduction in paragraph (2).(2) (A) The credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by 6 percent of the applicable of the following:(i) In the case of spouses filing a joint return and surviving spouses, the amount by which the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).(ii) For all other filers, the amount by which the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).(B) A reduction made pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed the maximum value of the credit.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Earned income” shall have the same meaning as is provided in Section 32(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to earned income.(2) “Qualified dependent” means a dependent who is a qualifying child of the taxpayer and for whom the taxpayer has not received any qualified foster care payments during the taxable year.(3) “Qualified foster care payment” shall have the same meaning as is provided in Section 131 of the Internal Revenue Code.(2)(4) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual for whom both of the following are true: who meets both of the following:(A) The taxpayer, or the taxpayer or their spouse in the case of spouses filing joint returns and surviving spouses, is or would have been 65 years of age or older as of the last day of the taxable year. (B) No part of the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income for the taxable year consists of earned income.(5) “Qualifying child” shall have the same meaning as is provided in Section 152(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualifying child.(c) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding six taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.(c)(d) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41 as it relates to the credit authorized by this section, the Legislature finds and declares that the specific goal, purpose, and objective of this credit is to provide assistance to retired senior taxpayers who are caring for dependents while the cost of living continues to rise.(2) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Legislative Analyst’s Office The Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Legislature, on or before January July 1, 2032, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the average amount of the credit claimed by allowed to a qualified taxpayer and how many the number of taxpayers claimed allowed the credit.(3)(A)Notwithstanding any other law, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide all information required to complete the report required by paragraph (2) to the Legislative Analyst’s Office.(B)The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(d)(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2032, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.